Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8240
Department; statewide duties.

The department shall establish and maintain the following on a statewide basis:

(1) Trauma system objectives and priorities;

(2) Minimum trauma standards for facilities, equipment, and personnel for advanced, basic, comprehensive, and general level trauma centers and specialty level burn or pediatric trauma centers;

(3) Minimum standards for facilities, equipment, and personnel for advanced, intermediate, and general level rehabilitation centers;

(4) Minimum trauma standards for the development of facility patient care protocols;

(5) Trauma care regions as provided for in section 71-8250;

(6) A program for emergency medical services and trauma care research and development; and

(7) The designation of hospitals and health care facilities to provide designated trauma care services.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 40;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 101;

Laws 2015, LB46, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 53;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 110.